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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

DIAV1-01

DTC P2757

Torque Converter Clutch Pressure Control Solenoid
Performance(Shift Solenoid Valve SLU)

D01769

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION

The Engine and ECT ECU uses the signals from the Throttle
position Sensor and Air-flow Meter to monitor the engagement
condition of the lock-up clutch.

Then the Engine and ECT ECU compares the engagement
condition of the lock—up clutch with the lock-up schedule in the
Engine and ECT ECU memory to detect mechanical trouble of
the shift solenoid valve SLU, valve body, torque converter and
automatic transmission assembly (clutch, brake or gear etc.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P2757
° in the lock-up OFF range.

(2-trip detection logic)

Lock-up does not occur when driving in the lock-up range « Shift solenoid valve SLU is stuck open or closed
(normal driving at 80 km/h [50 mph]), or lock-up remains ON |  Valve body blocked up or stuck

e Lock-up clutch
* Automatic transmission assembly

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve SLU operation.

D12795

@

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(o) Remove the oil pan.

() Remove the shift solenoid valve SLU.

CHECK:

(@) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-
lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 - 5.6 Q at 20°C (68° F)

(b) Connectthe positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (-) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:

Standard

(See page AT-8).

NG> Replace the shift solenoid valve SLU
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2 [ Check valve body (See page DI-26).

@

3 | Check torque converter (See page AT-43).

NG> Replace the valve body (See page AT-8).

OK Repair or replace transmission (See page
AT-31).

@

Replace the torque converter
(See page AT-31).

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)




